fi: Organzan viimeistely/kiillotus: Devoré (Burnout); Kohokuvioitu/jakardi; Folio; Kimalle/paljetti; Erittäin kiiltävä; Helmiäishohtoinen/kaksivärinen; Matta; Himmeästi kiiltävä; Muu
fr: Finition ou brillance de l’organza: Dévoré; Gaufré/jacquard; Métallisé; Paillettes/sequins; Ultra-brillant; Irisé/changeant; Mat; Brillance douce; Autre
nb: Organza-finish/glans: Utbrent; Preget/jacquard; Folie; Glitter/paljett; Høy glans; Iriserende/skiftende; Matt; Myk glans; Annet
lt-LT: Organzos apdaila / blizgesys: Išdegintas raštas; Reljefinis / žakardinis; Folija; Blizgučiai / žvyneliai; Stiprus blizgesys; Švytintis / keičiantis spalvą; Matinis; Švelnus blizgesys; Kita
hr-HR: Završna obrada/sjaj organze: Spaljeno (burnout); Reljefno/žakard; Folija; Šljokice/fliteri; Visoki sjaj; Preljevno (iridescentno); Mat; Blagi sjaj; Ostalo
bg-BG: Покритие и блясък на органзата: Деворе; Релефно/жакард; Фолио; Брокат/пайети; Силен блясък; Ирисцентно/шанжан; Матово; Мек блясък; Друго
es: Acabado o brillo de la organza: Devorado; En relieve/jacquard; Laminado; Purpurina/lentejuelas; Alto brillo; Tornasolado/irisado; Mate; Brillo suave; Otro
zh-CN: 欧根纱质感/光泽: 烧花; 压花/提花; 烫金; 亮片/珠片; 高光泽; 虹彩/闪光; 哑光; 柔和光泽; 其他
ru: Отделка/блеск органзы: Деворе; Тисненая/жаккардовая; Фольгированная; С глиттером/пайетками; Сильный блеск; Переливающаяся/хамелеон; Матовая; Мягкий блеск; Другое
en: Organza finish / sheen: Burnout; Embossed/jacquard; Foil; Glitter/sequin; High sheen; Iridescent/shot; Matte; Soft sheen; Other
ko: 오간자 마감/광택: 번아웃; 엠보싱/자카드; 포일; 글리터/스팽글; 고광택; 무지갯빛/투톤(shot); 매트; 은은한 광택; 기타
hu: Organza felülete/fényessége: Kiégetett; Dombornyomott/jacquard; Fóliás; Csillámos/flitteres; Erősen fényes; Irizáló/színjátszó; Matt; Lágy fényű; Egyéb
el: Φινίρισμα / γυαλάδα από οργάντζα: Φιλ κουπέ (Burnout); Ανάγλυφο/ζακάρ; Μεταλλικό φύλλο; Γκλίτερ/πούλιες; Έντονη γυαλάδα; Ιριδίζον; Ματ; Απαλή γυαλάδα; Άλλο
de: Organza-Finish/-Glanz: Ausbrenner; Geprägt/Jacquard; Folie; Glitzer/Pailletten; Hochglänzend; Schillernd/Changierend; Matt; Leicht glänzend; Sonstige
tr: Organza yüzey kaplaması / parlaklık seviyesi: Yakma; Kabartmalı/jakarlı; Folyo; Sim/pul; Yüksek parlaklık; Yanardöner; Mat; Hafif parlak; Diğer
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava / sijaj organze: Izžgan vzorec; Reliefno/žakard; Folija; Bleščice/fliterji; Močan sijaj; Prelivajoče se; Mat; Rahel sijaj; Drugo
ja: オーガンジー仕上げ／光沢: バーンアウト; エンボス/ジャカード; 箔; グリッター/スパンコール; 強い光沢; 玉虫色/ショット; マット; 柔らかな光沢; その他
th: ผิวสัมผัส/ความเงาแบบผ้าออร์แกนซ่า: เบิร์นเอาต์; ลายนูน/ผ้าแจ็กการ์ด; ฟอยล์; กลิตเตอร์/เลื่อม; เงาสูง; สีรุ้ง/ช็อต; แมตต์; เงาอ่อน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Organza acabamento/brilho: Devorê; Em relevo/jacquard; Metalizado; Glitter/lantejoula; Alto brilho; Furta-cor/iridescente; Fosco; Brilho suave; Outros
pt-PT: Acabamento/brilho em organza: Devorê; Com relevo/jacquard; Foil; Purpurina/lantejoulas; Alto brilho; Iridescente/furtacor; Mate; Brilho suave; Outro
da: Organzafinish eller -glans: Udbrændt; Præget/jacquard; Folie; Glimmer/paillet; Høj glans; Iriserende/changeant; Mat; Blød glans; Andet
it: Finitura/lucentezza dell'organza: Dévoré; Goffrato/jacquard; Laminato; Glitter/paillettes; Molto lucido; Cangiante/iridescente; Opaco; Leggermente lucido; Altro
sv: Organza-finish / glans: Ausbrenner; Präglad/jacquard; Folie; Glitter/paljett; Högglansig; Skimrande/chameleon; Matt; Mjuk glans; Övrigt
ro-RO: Finisaj/luciu din organza: Devoré / Burnout; Reliefat/jacquard; Folie; Sclipici/paiete; Luciu intens; Irizat/glacé; Mat; Luciu discret; Altele
zh-TW: 歐根紗表面處理/光澤: 爛花; 壓花/提花; 燙金; 亮片/珠片; 高光澤; 虹彩/變色; 霧面; 柔和光澤; 其他
vi: Bề mặt/độ bóng của vải organza: In dập (Burnout); Dập nổi/Jacquard; Ép nhũ; Kim tuyến/Sequin; Độ bóng cao; Ánh kim/đổi màu; Mờ; Độ bóng nhẹ; Khác
sk-SK: Úprava/lesk organzy: Vypaľovaná (Devoré); Reliéfna/žakárová; Fólia; Trblietavá/flitrová; Vysoký lesk; Dúhová/menivá; Matná; Jemný lesk; Iné
pl: Wykończenie organza / połysk: Wypalane; Tłoczone/żakardowe; Foliowane; Brokat/cekiny; Wysoki połysk; Iryzujące/mieniące się; Matowe; Delikatny połysk; Inne
nl: Organza afwerking / glans: Burn-out; Reliëf/jacquard; Folie; Glitter/pailletten; Hoogglans; Iriserend/changeant; Mat; Zachte glans; Overige
cs: Povrch/lesk organzy: Vypalovaný; Ražený/žakárový; Fólie; Třpytky/flitry; Vysoký lesk; Měňavý; Matný; Jemný lesk; Ostatní